Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.091

Execution or amendment by judicial order.

(1) If a person required to execute a certificate required by this chapter fails or refuses to do so, any other person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal may petition the superior courts to direct the execution of the certificate under RCW 23.95.245.

(2) If a person required to execute a limited liability company agreement or amendment thereof fails or refuses to do so, any other person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal may petition the superior courts to direct the execution of the limited liability company agreement or amendment thereof. If the court finds that the limited liability company agreement or amendment thereof should be executed and that any person required to execute the limited liability company agreement or amendment thereof has failed or refused to do so, it shall enter an order granting appropriate relief.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7110; 2015 c 188 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.